District of Columbia statutes.
4-209.03

Repealed

Notification of adverse action not permitted.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 903, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(fff), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-209.3.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(fff) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(fff) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 8, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(fff) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(fff) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521) and § 2(fff) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).